Vermont, session 2025-2026, H761.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. REPEAL
23 V.S.A. § 518 (electronic issuance of temporary plate and temporary
registration) is repealed.
Sec. 2. 23 V.S.A. § 511 is amended to read:
§ 511. MANNER OF DISPLAY
(a) Number plates. A motor vehicle operated on any highway shall have
displayed in a conspicuous place either one or two number plates as the
Commissioner may require. Such The number plates shall be furnished by the
VT LEG #386291 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.761
2026 Page 2 of 3
Commissioner and shall show the number assigned to such the vehicle by the
Commissioner. If only one number plate is furnished, the same plate shall be
securely attached to the rear of the vehicle. If two are furnished, one shall be
securely attached to the rear and one to the front of the vehicle. The number
plates shall be kept entirely unobscured, and the numerals and letters thereon
on each plate shall be plainly legible at all times. They shall be kept
horizontal, shall be so fastened as not to swing, excepting, however, there may
be installed on a motor truck or truck tractor a device that would, upon contact
with a substantial object, permit the rear number plate to swing toward the
front of the vehicle, provided such the device automatically returns the number
plate to its original rigid position after contact is released, and the ground
clearance of the lower edges thereof of the number plate shall be established by
the Commissioner pursuant to the provisions of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.
* * *
(e) Temporary and in-transit registration plates. A motor vehicle issued a
temporary or in-transit registration plate under sections section 312, 458, 463,
and 516-518, or 517 of this title operated on any highway shall have the
temporary or in-transit registration plate displayed horizontally in a
conspicuous place on the rear of the vehicle, including in the rear window.
The temporary or in-transit registration plate shall be kept entirely unobscured,
VT LEG #386291 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.761
2026 Page 3 of 3
and the numerals and letters thereon on the plate shall be plainly legible at all
times.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386291 v.2